apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="env/oyer__vblex">
            
<e><p><l>erra</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>errai</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>erraient</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>errais</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>errais</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>errait</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>erras</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>errez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>erriez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>errions</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>errons</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>erront</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oient</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oient</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oies</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oies</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oya</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyai</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyaient</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyais</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyais</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyait</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyant</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyant</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyas</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyasse</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyassent</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyasses</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyassiez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyassions</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyer</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyiez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyiez</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyions</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyions</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyons</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyons</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyons</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyâmes</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyât</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyâtes</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyèrent</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyé</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyée</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyées</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oyés</l><r>oyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="et__cnjcoo">
            
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eux__prn">
            
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ex__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

          <e lm="et"><i>et</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
          <e lm="car"><i>car</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
          <e lm="eux"><i>eux</i><par n="eux__prn"/></e>
          <e lm="mais"><i>mais</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
          <e lm="ni"><i>ni</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
          <e lm="ou"><i>ou</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
          <e lm="rien à voir"><i>rien<b/>à<b/>voir</i><par n="ex__n"/></e>
		  <e lm="commis"><i>commis</i><par n="ex__n"/></e>
          <e lm="ex" a="webform"><i>ex</i><par n="ex__n"/></e>
          <e lm="porte-parole"><i>porte-parole</i><par n="ex__n"/></e>
          <e lm="envoyer"><i>env</i><par n="env/oyer__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="réenvoyer"><i>réenv</i><par n="env/oyer__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="renvoyer"><i>renv</i><par n="env/oyer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="broyer du noir" a="webform"><i>br</i><par n="env/oyer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>du<b/>noir</l><r><g><b/>du<b/>noir</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="renvoyer la balle" a="webform"><i>renv</i><par n="env/oyer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>balle</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>balle</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="envoyer une demande" a="eleka">
  <i>env</i>
  <par n="env/oyer__vblex"/>
<p>
    <l><b/>une<b/>demande</l>
    <r><g><b/>une<b/>demande</g></r>
  </p>
</e>
